lexc-files/derivational-suffixes/verb-suffixing/verb-derivSuffix_finalE.txt
^+sugh(V→V):^sugh                              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to test how V (it) is; to check how V (it) is
^+tagh(V→V):^tagh                              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be V by nature or disposition; to keep on V-ing
^+tugh(V→V):^tugh                              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to keep on V-ing; to V by repeated actions
^+tuqagh(V→V):^tuqagh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V for a (short) while
^+tutkaligh(V→V):^tutkaligh                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to measure the approximate the V of (it)
^~fughtagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}ughtagh                VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V all things available; to V completely
^–vyigh(V→V):^vyigh                            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to almost V; to V to the extent that one is able
^–vzigh(V→V):^vzigh                            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to almost V; to V to the extent that one is able
^–vyiigh(V→V):^vyiigh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V carelessly; to V in a rough way 
^–vziigh(V→V):^vziigh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V carelessly; to V in a rough way
^@~fyaghagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}yaghagh               VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V early
^@~fyaaghagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}yaaghagh             VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to readily V
^@~fyaghtugh(V→V):^%{.f.%}yaghtugh             VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be about to V; to go somewhere to V
^@~fyaghtuqagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}yaghtuqagh         VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to briefly go somewhere to V
^@~fyuggaagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}yuggaagh             VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to first V; to V in the beginning
^+yuggaaqagh(V→V):^yuggaaqagh                  VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to briefly V first, to briefly V in the beginning
^@~fyugnagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}yugnagh               VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be easy to V
^@~fyukagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}yukagh                 VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be ready to V; to be about to V; to be all set to V; to make a move toward V-ing
^@~fyuwhaagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}yuwhaagh             VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to first V; to V in the beginning
^@~–(g)kaayagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}kaayagh            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to have V-ed fruitlessly; to have V-ed in vain; to have V-ed but ...
^@~–(g)kaayagh(V→V):^gkaayagh                  VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to have V-ed fruitlessly; to have V-ed in vain; to have V-ed but ...
^@~–(g)kaqsagh(V→V):^%{.f.%}kaqsagh            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to have V-ed fruitlessly; to have V-ed in vain; to have V-ed but ...
^@~–(g)kaqsagh(V→V):^gkaqsagh                  VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to have V-ed fruitlessly; to have V-ed in vain; to have V-ed but ...
^+saghagh(CmpdVbl):^saghagh                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to try to induce one to V
^+(te)snanigh(CmpdVbl):^snanigh                VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tell not to V; to forbid one to V
^+aghaghte(V→V):^aghagh%{t%}e                  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to immediately V; to briefly V; to quickly V; to suddenly V
^~aghte(V→V):^%{.f.%}agh%{t%}e                 VerbPostbaseV;   ! to suddenly V
^@–ghpagte(V→V):^ghpag%{t%}e                   VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V rapidly, suddenly or in a major way
^–ghraagte(V→V):^ghraag%{t%}e                  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to be somewhat V-er; to be partly V 
^–ghte(V→V):^gh%{t%}e                          VerbPostbaseV;   ! to become V 
^@~%:(i/u)mafte(V→V):^%{.f.%}umaf%{t%}e        VerbPostbaseV;   ! how much subject evidently has V-ed!
^~f–laghate(V→V):^%{.f.%}lagha%{t%}e           VerbPostbaseV;   ! to have already V-ed together; to V as a group
^–lgute(V→V):^lgu%{t%}e                        VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V together with; to help (object) V
^–mrugnite(V→V):^mrugni%{t%}e                  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to seem to be somewhat V 
^@~fnaqute(V→V):^%{.f.%}naqu%{t%}e             VerbPostbaseV;   ! to try to V
^@~f–neghllugte(V→V):^%{.f.%}neghllug%{t%}e    VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V wrongly or with difficulty
^@–nghiighte(V→V):^nghiigh%{t%}e               VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V to a large extent; to V in a big way
^@–nqegte(V→V):^nqeg%{t%}e                     VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V easily; to V readily
^@–nqigte(V→V):^nqig%{t%}e                     VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V again
^–pigte(V→V):^pig%{t%}e                        VerbPostbaseV;   ! to be very V
^~–qaghte(V→V):^%{.f.%}qagh%{t%}e              VerbPostbaseV;   ! to suddenly V
^~–qite(V→V):^%{.f.%}qi%{t%}e                  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to encounter V
^~(q/t)uute(V→V):^%{.f.%}uu%{t%}e              VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V as a group; to V together
^@~f–ragkiighute(V→V):^%{.f.%}ragkiighu%{t%}e  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V quickly
^@~f–rakegte(V→V):^%{.f.%}rakeg%{t%}e          VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V quickly
^+sugnite(V→V):^sugni%{t%}e                    VerbPostbaseV;   ! to seem to be V-ing
^@~%:(u)te(V→V):^%{.f.%}u%{t%}e                VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V for; to V together with; to V each other
^@~fyaghpete(V→V):^%{.f.%}yaghpe%{t%}e         VerbPostbaseV;   ! to evidently have V-ed but in vain
^@~fyaghqaaghte(V→V):^%{.f.%}yaghqaagh%{t%}e   VerbPostbaseV;   ! to become necessary to V; to have to V now
^@~fyaaghte(V→V):^%{.f.%}yaagh%{t%}e           VerbPostbaseV;   ! to learn to V
^@~fyagute(V→V):^%{.f.%}yagu%{t%}e             VerbPostbaseV;   ! to reach a state of V-ing
^@~–(g)kayugughte(V→V):^%{.f.%}kayugugh%{t%}e  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to become able to V
^+(te)snaanghite(CmpdVbl):^snaanghi%{t%}e      VerbPostbaseV;   ! to tell one not to V in the future; to forbid one from V-ing in the future
^+(te)ste(CmpdVbl):^s%{t%}e                    VerbPostbaseV;   ! to cause one to V; to allow one to V; to make one V; to let one V; to have one V
^+(te)sigate(CmpdVbl):^siga%{t%}e**            VerbPostbaseVI;  ! to prevent or keep one from V-ing; to not allow one to V; to not let one V

^@~%:(i/u)ma(V→N):^%{.f.%}uma               NounPostbaseI;    ! one who V-s
^@–lghii(V→N):^lghii                        NounPostbaseI;    ! the one that V-ed
^+tala(V→N):^tala                           NounPostbaseI;    ! the extent of V-ness
^@~f–yu(V→N):^%{.f.%}yu                     NounPostbaseI;    ! one who is good at V-ing
^–ghllag(V→N):^ghllag                       NounInflII;       ! big N (augmentive)
^@~f–neghllug(V→N):^%{.f.%}neghllug         NounPostbaseII;   ! something that is difficult or hard to V; one who hardly needs to V
^–rkapig(V→N):^rkapig                       NounPostbaseII;   ! one that is very V
^–sag(V→N):^sag                             NounPostbaseII;   ! one who V-s; habitual V-er
^@~fvig(V→N):^%{.f.%}vig                    NounPostbaseII;   ! place to V; time to V (esp. in month names)
^~–kayug(V→N):^%{.f.%}gkayug                NounPostbaseII;   ! one that V-s readily; one who is able to V
^+tuqagh(V→N):^tuqa%{g%}h                   NounInflIII;      ! one with lots of N (augmentive)
^+kagh(V→N):^ka%{g%}h                       NounPostbaseIII;  ! raw material for V-ing; something to be V-ed
^–lleghpigagh(V→N):^lleghpiga%{g%}h         NounPostbaseIII;  ! most V one
^–lleghqagh(V→N):^lleghqa%{g%}h             NounPostbaseIII;  ! future act of V-ing
^@–nghhagh(V→N):^nghha%{g%}h                NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that has recently V-ed
^~(ng)iitagh(V→N):^%{.f.%}ngiita%{g%}h      NounPostbaseIII;  ! device to prevent V-ing
^~fnigh(V→N):^%{.f.%}ni%{g%}h               NounPostbaseIII;  ! thing that is good to V
^@–nqegtagh(V→N):^nqegta%{g%}h              NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that V-s easily; one that V-s readily
^+qagh(V→N):^qa%{g%}h                       NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that is V
^+qutagh(V→N):^quta%{g%}h                   NounPostbaseIII;  ! device associated with V-ing
^@~f–rakegtagh(V→N):^%{.f.%}rakegta%{g%}h   NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that Vs quickly 
^–rkaggagh(V→N):^rkagga%{g%}h               NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that is a little bit V; one that is slightly V
^+tuqagh(V→N):^tuqa%{g%}h                   NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that V-s habitually
^–tuqagh(V→N):^tuqa%{g%}h                   NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that V-s habitually
^~%:(u)sagh(V→N):^%{.f.%}usa%{g%}h          NounPostbaseIII;  ! something that has been V-ed
^~%:(u)sigh(V→N):^%{.f.%}usi%{g%}h          NounPostbaseIII;  ! device for V-ing; instrument for V-ing
^@~fyaghqagh(V→N):^%{.f.%}yaghqa%{g%}h      NounPostbaseIII;  ! something that will V or be V-ed
^@~f–yuqagh(V→N):^%{.f.%}yuqa%{g%}h         NounPostbaseIII;  ! one who is good at V-ing; proficient V-er
^@~–(g)kagh(V→N):^%{.f.%}ka%{g%}h           NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that has V-ed or been V-ed
^@~–(g)kagh(V→N):^gka%{g%}h                 NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that has V-ed or been V-ed
^+aagh(V→N):^aagh                           NounInflV;        ! one who keeps V-ing (augmentive)
^–perewaagh(V→N):^perewaagh                 NounPostbaseV;    ! all, only, or totally V
^~fmiigh(V→N):^%{.f.%}miigh                 NounPostbaseV;    ! thing held by V-ing 
^~–qumtaagh(V→N):^%{.f.%}qumtaagh           NounPostbaseV;    ! frequently V-ed thing; usually V-ed thing; commonly V-ed thing
^@~fyuggaagh(V→N):^%{.f.%}yuggaagh          NounPostbaseV;    ! first one to V
^@~fyuwhaagh(V→N):^%{.f.%}yuwhaagh          NounPostbaseV;    ! first one to V
^@~%:(i/u)mate(V→N):^%{.f.%}uma%{t%}e       NounPostbaseVI;   ! the time while V-ing; the course of V-ing
^(s)ta(V→N):^s%{t%}e                        NounPostbaseVI;   ! habitual V-er; one who V-s as an occupation
^@~%:(u)te(V→N):^%{.f.%}u%{t%}e             NounPostbaseVI;   ! condition with respect to V-ing
^–llegh(V→N):^llegh                         NounPostbaseVII;  ! one that has V-ed or been V-ed; act of V-ing; activity of V-ing; the one the possessor V-ed; one or ones which are V to the greatest extent; most V ones; more V ones
^–lleg(V→N):^lleg                           NounPostbaseVII;  ! one who V-s well; proficient V-er; good V-er
^@~f–negh(V→N):^%{.f.%}negh                 NounPostbaseVII;  ! the act of V-ing; the activity of V-ing; the state of being V
^@–negh(V→N):^negh                          NounPostbaseVII;  ! the one or ones which are V to the greatest extent
^@~fnaqe(V→N):^%{.f.%}naqe                  NounPostbaseVIII; ! one who is going to V
^@~–(g)ke(V→N):^%{.f.%}ke                   NounPostbaseVIII; ! the ones possessor is V-ing
^@~–(g)ke(V→N):^gke                         NounPostbaseVIII; ! the ones possessor is V-ing

^@~%:(i/u)magh*(V→QUANTQUAL):^%{.f.%}umagh  QuantQualInfl; ! while V-ing
